Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/kik_KE.aff
#gk_KE.aff - Gikuyu(ke) affix file for use in Hunspell
# Prepared by Kamau Chege

#Version 0.8
#Last Edit 26/02/2009 11:00 Hrs
COMPLEXPREFIXES
NEEDAFFIX 001
CIRCUMFIX 002

FLAG num
SET UTF-8

WORDCHARS -'
TRY eiĩanrtocduũgmhbykw'jNRTCGDMHBEAUŨYOIĨKWJ


REP 35
REP s c
REP sh c
REP sh ch
REP ch c
REP c ch
REP f b
REP v b
REP l r
REP d nd
REP g ng
REP ng g
REP ng ng'
REP ng' ng
REP u ũ
REP ũ u
REP i ĩ
REP ĩ i
REP b mb
REP mb b
REP j nj
REP dh th
REP i ii
REP ii i
REP u uu
REP uu u
REP a aa
REP aa a
REP e ee
REP ee e
REP ĩ ĩĩ
REP ĩĩ ĩ
REP ũ ũũ
REP ũũ ũ
REP o oo
REP oo o
REP ũa wa
REP ĩa ya
REP ya ĩa 
REP ũo wo
REP wo ũo
REP ũi wi


PFX 201 Y 25
PFX 201 mb kab mb
PFX 201 mb tũb mb
PFX 201 mb kĩb mb
PFX 201 mb rũb mb
PFX 201 mb mab mb
PFX 201 nd gat nd
PFX 201 nd tũt nd
PFX 201 nd gĩt nd
PFX 201 nd rũt nd
PFX 201 nd mat nd
PFX 201 nj gac nj
PFX 201 nj tũc nj
PFX 201 nj gĩc nj
PFX 201 nj rũc nj
PFX 201 nj mac nj
PFX 201 ng kag ng
PFX 201 ng tũg ng
PFX 201 ng kĩg ng
PFX 201 ng rũg ng
PFX 201 ng mag ng
PFX 201 ng' kag ng'
PFX 201 ng' tũg ng'
PFX 201 ng' kĩg ng'
PFX 201 ng' rũg ng'
PFX 201 ng' mag ng'

PFX 202 Y 16
PFX 202 0 ka [abmngrw][^bdngj]
PFX 202 0 tũ [abmngrw][^bdngj]
PFX 202 0 kĩ [abmngrw][^bdngj]
PFX 202 0 rũ .
PFX 202 0 ma .
PFX 202 i ka i[^cktĩ]
PFX 202 i tũ i[^cktĩ]
PFX 202 i kĩ i[^cktĩ]
PFX 202 i rũ i
PFX 202 i ma i
PFX 202 0 ga [cktĩ]
PFX 202 0 tũ [cktĩ]
PFX 202 0 gĩ [cktĩ]
PFX 202 i ga i[cktĩ]
PFX 202 i tũ i[cktĩ]
PFX 202 i gĩ i[cktĩ]


SFX 251 Y 1
SFX 251 0 -inĩ .



# All Noun Classes Current Subject,Assumed Object, Current Past -0-, -a-
PFX 611 Y 141
PFX 611 0 nda [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 611 a nda a
PFX 611 e nde e
PFX 611 ĩ nde ĩ
PFX 611 o ndo o
PFX 611 ũ ndo ũ
PFX 611 0 ndaa [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 611 a ndaa a
PFX 611 e ndee e
PFX 611 ĩ ndee ĩ
PFX 611 o ndoo o
PFX 611 ũ ndoo ũ
PFX 611 0 twa [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 611 a twa a
PFX 611 e twe e
PFX 611 ĩ twe ĩ
PFX 611 o two o
PFX 611 ũ two ũ
PFX 611 0 twaa [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 611 a twaa a
PFX 611 e twee e
PFX 611 ĩ twee ĩ
PFX 611 o twoo o
PFX 611 ũ twoo ũ
PFX 611 0 wa [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 611 a wa a
PFX 611 e we e
PFX 611 ĩ we ĩ
PFX 611 o wo o
PFX 611 ũ wo ũ
PFX 611 0 waa [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 611 a waa a
PFX 611 e wee e
PFX 611 ĩ wee ĩ
PFX 611 o woo o
PFX 611 ũ woo ũ
PFX 611 0 a [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 611 ĩ e ĩ
PFX 611 ũ o ũ
PFX 611 0 aa [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 611 a aa a
PFX 611 e ee e
PFX 611 ĩ ee ĩ
PFX 611 o oo o
PFX 611 ũ oo ũ
PFX 611 0 mwa [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 611 a mwa a
PFX 611 e mwe e
PFX 611 ĩ mwe ĩ
PFX 611 o mwo o
PFX 611 ũ mwo ũ
PFX 611 0 mwaa [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 611 a mwaa a
PFX 611 e mwee e
PFX 611 ĩ mwee ĩ
PFX 611 o mwoo o
PFX 611 ũ mwoo ũ
PFX 611 0 ma [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 611 a ma a
PFX 611 e me e
PFX 611 ĩ me ĩ
PFX 611 o mo o
PFX 611 ũ mo ũ
PFX 611 0 maa [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 611 a maa a
PFX 611 e mee e
PFX 611 ĩ mee ĩ
PFX 611 o moo o
PFX 611 ũ moo ũ
PFX 611 0 ya [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 611 a ya a
PFX 611 e ye e
PFX 611 ĩ ye ĩ
PFX 611 o yo o
PFX 611 ũ yo ũ
PFX 611 0 yaa [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 611 a yaa a
PFX 611 e yee e
PFX 611 ĩ yee ĩ
PFX 611 o yoo o
PFX 611 ũ yoo ũ
PFX 611 0 rĩa [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 611 a rĩa a
PFX 611 e rĩe e
PFX 611 ĩ rĩe ĩ
PFX 611 o rĩo o
PFX 611 ũ rĩo ũ
PFX 611 0 rĩaa [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 611 a rĩaa a
PFX 611 e rĩee e
PFX 611 ĩ rĩee ĩ
PFX 611 o rĩoo o
PFX 611 ũ rĩoo ũ
PFX 611 0 gĩa [^aeĩoũbghmnr]
PFX 611 a gĩa a[ckt]
PFX 611 e gĩe e[ckt]
PFX 611 ĩ gĩe ĩ[ckt]
PFX 611 o gĩo o[ckt]
PFX 611 ũ gĩo ũ[ckt]
PFX 611 0 gĩaa [^aeĩoũ][ckt]
PFX 611 a gĩaa a[ckt]
PFX 611 e gĩee e[ckt]
PFX 611 ĩ gĩee ĩ[ckt]
PFX 611 o gĩoo o[ckt]
PFX 611 ũ gĩoo ũ[ckt]
PFX 611 0 kĩa [^aeĩoũckt]
PFX 611 a kĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 611 e kĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 611 ĩ kĩe ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 611 o kĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 611 ũ kĩo ũ[^ckt]
PFX 611 0 kĩaa [^aeĩoũckt]
PFX 611 a kĩaa a[^ckt]
PFX 611 e kĩee e[^ckt]
PFX 611 ĩ kĩee ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 611 o kĩoo o[^ckt]
PFX 611 ũ kĩoo ũ[^ckt]
PFX 611 0 ha [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 611 a ha a
PFX 611 e he e
PFX 611 ĩ he ĩ
PFX 611 o ho o
PFX 611 ũ ho ũ
PFX 611 0 haa [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 611 a haa a
PFX 611 e hee e
PFX 611 ĩ hee ĩ
PFX 611 o hoo o
PFX 611 ũ hoo ũ
PFX 611 0 gũ [ckt]
PFX 611 a gũa a[ckt]
PFX 611 e gũe e[ckt]
PFX 611 ĩ gũe ĩ[ckt]
PFX 611 o gũo o[ckt]
PFX 611 ũ gũo ũ[ckt]
PFX 611 0 kũ [bghmnr]
PFX 611 a kũa a[^ckt]
PFX 611 e kũe e[^ckt]
PFX 611 ĩ kũe ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 611 o kũo o[^ckt]
PFX 611 ũ kũo ũ[^ckt]

# NEGATION, All Noun Classes Current Subject,Assumed Object, Current Past -0-, -a-
PFX 711 Y 130
PFX 711 0 ndi [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 711 a ndia a
PFX 711 e ndie e
PFX 711 ĩ ndiĩ ĩ
PFX 711 o ndio o
PFX 711 ũ ndiũ ũ
PFX 711 0 ndina [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 711 a ndina a
PFX 711 e ndine e
PFX 711 ĩ ndine ĩ
PFX 711 o ndino o
PFX 711 ũ ndino ũ
PFX 711 0 tũti [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 711 a tũtia a
PFX 711 e tũtie e
PFX 711 ĩ tũtiĩ ĩ
PFX 711 o tũtio o
PFX 711 ũ tũtiũ ũ
PFX 711 0 tũtina [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 711 a tũtina a
PFX 711 e tũtine e
PFX 711 ĩ tũtine ĩ
PFX 711 o tũtino o
PFX 711 ũ tũtino ũ
PFX 711 0 ndũ [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 711 a ndũa a
PFX 711 e ndwe e
PFX 711 ĩ ndwĩ ĩ
PFX 711 o nduo o
PFX 711 ũ ndũ ũ
PFX 711 0 ndũna [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 711 a ndũna a
PFX 711 e ndũne e
PFX 711 ĩ ndũne ĩ
PFX 711 o ndũno o
PFX 711 ũ ndũno ũ
PFX 711 0 nda [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 711 e nde e
PFX 711 ĩ nde ĩ
PFX 711 ũ ndo ũ
PFX 711 0 ndana [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 711 a ndana a
PFX 711 e ndane e
PFX 711 ĩ ndane ĩ
PFX 711 o ndano o
PFX 711 ũ ndano ũ
PFX 711 0 mũti [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 711 a mũtia a
PFX 711 e mũtie e
PFX 711 ĩ mũtiĩ ĩ
PFX 711 o  mũtio o
PFX 711 ũ mũtiũ ũ
PFX 711 0 mũtina [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 711 a mũtina a
PFX 711 e mũtine e
PFX 711 ĩ mũtine ĩ
PFX 711 o mũtino o
PFX 711 ũ mũtino ũ
PFX 711 0 mati [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 711 a matia a
PFX 711 e matie e
PFX 711 ĩ matiĩ ĩ
PFX 711 o matio o
PFX 711 ũ matiũ ũ
PFX 711 0 matina [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 711 a matina a
PFX 711 e matine e
PFX 711 ĩ matine ĩ
PFX 711 o matino o
PFX 711 ũ matino ũ
PFX 711 0 ndĩ [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 711 a ndĩa a
PFX 711 e ndĩe e
PFX 711 ĩ ndĩĩ ĩ
PFX 711 o ndĩo o
PFX 711 ũ ndĩũ ũ
PFX 711 0 ndĩna [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 711 a ndĩna a
PFX 711 e ndĩne e
PFX 711 ĩ ndĩne ĩ
PFX 711 o ndĩno o
PFX 711 ũ ndĩno ũ
PFX 711 0 rĩti [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 711 a rĩtia a
PFX 711 e rĩtie e
PFX 711 ĩ rĩtiĩ ĩ
PFX 711 o rĩtio o
PFX 711 ũ rĩtiũ ũ
PFX 711 0 rĩtina [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 711 a rĩtina a
PFX 711 e rĩtine e
PFX 711 ĩ rĩtine ĩ
PFX 711 o rĩtino o
PFX 711 ũ rĩtino ũ
PFX 711 0 gĩti [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 711 a gĩtia a
PFX 711 e gĩtie e
PFX 711 ĩ gĩtiĩ ĩ
PFX 711 o gĩtio o
PFX 711 ũ gĩtiũ ũ
PFX 711 0 gĩtina [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 711 a gĩtina a
PFX 711 e gĩtine e
PFX 711 ĩ gĩtine ĩ
PFX 711 o gĩtino o
PFX 711 ũ gĩtino ũ
PFX 711 0 gũti [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 711 a gũtia a
PFX 711 e gũtie e
PFX 711 ĩ gũtiĩ ĩ
PFX 711 o gũtio o
PFX 711 ũ gũtiũ ũ
PFX 711 0 gũtina [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 711 a gũtina a
PFX 711 e gũtine e
PFX 711 ĩ gũtine ĩ
PFX 711 o gũtino o
PFX 711 ũ gũtino ũ
PFX 711 0 hati [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 711 a hati a
PFX 711 e hatie e
PFX 711 ĩ hatiĩ ĩ
PFX 711 o hatio o
PFX 711 ũ hatiũ ũ
PFX 711 0 hatina [^aeĩoũ]
PFX 711 a hatina a
PFX 711 e hatine e
PFX 711 ĩ hatine ĩ
PFX 711 o hatino o
PFX 711 ũ hatino ũ
