Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/kik_KE.dic
mbaara/201,251
mbembe/201,251
mbaamba/201,251
mbimbi/201,251
mbogo/201,251
mbugi/201,251
mbĩa/201,251
mbũca/201,251
ndaraca/201,251
ndege/201,251
ndigiri/201,251
ndindĩri/201,251
ndooro/201,251
nduundu/201,251
ndĩrĩ/201,251
nduma/201,251
ndũũma/201,251
mbere/201,251
mbura/201,251
mbimbiria/201,251
ngaari/201,251
mbiro/201,251
mbiira/201,251
mbirika/201,251
ndeto/201,251
ndari/201,251
mwaki/201,251
ngathĩ/201,251
ngathĩti/201,251
mwena/201,251
mwana/201,251
ndagĩka/201,251
mboco/201,251
ndemwa/201,251
ngee/201,251
ngi/201,251
ngingo/201,251
iceembe/202,251
icungwa/202,251
ngothi/201,251
nuthu/202,251
ngundi/201,251
ikinya/202,251
ikondo/202,251
ikonia/202,251
ikũnia/202,251
thaburi/202,251
thani/202,251
thayũ/202,251
theci/202,251
thigari/202,251
thikũ/202,251
thimũ/202,251
thingira/202,251
thirikari/202,251
thitima/202,251
thukuru/202,251
thutha/202,251
ikorobia/202,251
ikũmi/202,251
igogo/202,251
ithaha/202,251
igongona/202,251
njunjĩ/201,251
tawa/202,251
taũni/202,251
tene/202,251
ngui/201,251
ngĩĩa/201,251
ngũha/201,251
ndurwa/201,251
ngũkũ/201,251
njagathi/201,251
ndara/201,251
njaamba/201,251
njeege/201,251
njiika/201,251
njogu/201,251
njuukũ/201,251
njĩmbĩrĩ/201,251
njũrũũri/201,251
keki/202,251
mithi/202,251
memenyi/202,251
mondo/202,251
mondo/202,251
muura/202,251
ng'ombe/201,251
ng'unda/201,251
thaara/202,251
thaata/202,251
cuka/202,251
waara/202,251
bũrũri/202,251
cindano/202,251
coka/202,251
coro/202,251
cuka/202,251
watho/202,251
wĩra/202,251
akia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ania/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
atha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
banga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
buĩra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
canũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
cererwo/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450
cinda/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
cooka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
egega/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
enyenya/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
etha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
gata/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
gera/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
gona/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
gunĩka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
gwatia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
haara/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hana/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
harũrũka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hehũka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hikia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hiũka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hotha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
huria/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hĩa/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hĩĩnja/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hũũma/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
igua/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ina/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ira/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kararia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kera/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,45e
kerũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kombora/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
kubia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kunĩka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kĩa/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kũũma/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
mema/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
mira/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
nana/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ng'orota/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
noora/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
nyiita/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
onja/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
rakara/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
rehe/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
rigita/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
rooka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
ruta/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
rĩĩka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
taanga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tang'atang'a/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
teha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
teng'ũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thagathaga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
theetha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
thiathia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thingata/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thiĩ/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thombotha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
thura/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thũkũma/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tiira/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tuga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tĩĩya/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ĩkĩra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ũraga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
